Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-802
Terms, defined.

As used in Chapter 70, article 8, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Board means the Nebraska Power Review Board;

(2) The terms public power district and district as used in Chapter 70, article 8, each mean the same and also have the same meaning as the term public power district as applied to public corporations created under Chapter 70, article 6, and amendments thereof;

(3) Petitioner means the corporation or association which presents a petition to the Nebraska Power Review Board for the creation of a public power district pursuant to Chapter 70, article 8;

(4) Electric utility means the business of conducting or carrying on, in service to the public, any one or more of the functions or operations of generation, transmission, distribution, sale, and purchase of electrical energy, hydrogen, or ethanol for purposes of lighting, power, heating, and any and every other useful purpose whatsoever, and any and all plants, lines, systems, and any and all other property owned, used, operated, or useful for such operation;

(5) Electric cooperative corporation means a corporation organized under Chapter 70, article 7; and

(6) Rural area means any area not included within the boundaries of any incorporated city or village.

Laws 1949, c. 196, § 2, p. 571;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 36;

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 50;

Laws 2005, LB 139, § 18.